Hawaii statutes.
[§435C-6] Directors. The plan shall be
governed by a board of eleven directors, ten to be selected annually. Five
directors shall be elected by cumulative voting by the members of the plan,
whose votes in such election shall be weighted in accordance with each member's
net direct premiums written during the preceding calendar year. Three
directors shall be appointed by the insurance commissioner as representatives
of the medical profession. Two directors shall be appointed by the insurance
commissioner as representatives of the public. The five member companies
serving on the first board shall be elected at a meeting of the members, or
their authorized representatives, which shall be held at a time and place
designated by the insurance commissioner. The insurance commissioner shall
appoint the five directors serving on the first board on or before the date of
such meeting. The insurance commissioner shall be the other member and shall
be its chairperson. [L 1975, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next